Georgia, session 2025_26, HB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"49-4-159.5.
(a) The department shall provide Medicaid coverage for tobacco cessation treatments as
follows:
(1) The medical assistance program shall provide coverage and shall reimburse any
provider of medical assistance for tobacco cessation treatments for any recipient of
medical assistance, including:
H. B. 506
- 1 -

LC 57 0195
(A) Any United States Food and Drug Administration medication approved for tobacco
cessation when prescribed; and
(B) Individual, group, and telephone counseling for tobacco cessation, as defined by
the United States Public Health Services Guidelines or the United States Preventive
Services Task Force;
(2) A recipient of medical assistance shall not be limited in the number of covered
tobacco cessation attempts for counseling treatments, whether on an annual, lifetime, or
other basis; and
(3) The department and any managed care organization shall not impose:
(A) Prior authorization requirements upon any treatments prescribed or ordered by a
provider of medical assistance for tobacco cessation purposes; or
(B) Any copayment or other out-of-pocket cost sharing for tobacco cessation
treatments for a recipient of medical assistance, including any deductible.
(b) The department shall implement and administer the provisions of this Code section
consistent with applicable federal laws and regulations and shall submit to the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services any state Medicaid plan amendment, waiver
request, or other approval request necessary to implement the provisions of this Code
section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 506
- 2 -